Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2511.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 304.3. Exception from tax for early withdrawals from certain accounts.--(a) In accordance with the current tax exemption by the Federal Government, the following shall be exempt from taxation as personal income in this Commonwealth, to the limits under subsection (b):(1) Expenses related to the birth or adoption of a child.12345678910111213141516171819202122 (2) The purchase of a house by a first time homebuyer.(b) The following amounts shall be excluded from tax:(1) Each parent may withdraw up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) individually for each child born or adopted.(2) The parents may withdraw up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) together for each child born or adopted.(3) Each first time homebuyer may withdraw up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).Section 2. This act shall apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2511PN3398 - 2 - 1234567891011